Connecticut, session 2026, HB05037.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. (NEW) (Effective January 1, 2028) (a) As used in this section:
2 (1) "Covered minor" means any covered user who is younger than
3 eighteen years of age;
4 (2) "Covered operator" (A) means any operator who operates or
5 provides a covered platform, and (B) does not include the federal
6 government, any state or municipal government or any agency or
7 instrumentality of the federal government or of any state or municipal
8 government;
9 (3) "Covered platform" (A) means any platform that, as a significant
10 part of the services offered, recommends, selects or prioritizes for
11 display, either concurrently or sequentially, media items generated or
12 shared on a platform by users of such platform, and (B) does not include
sHB5037 / File No. 179 1

sHB5037 File No. 179
13 any platform that (i) primarily facilitates the sale of goods, or (ii) is used
14 solely for educational purposes pursuant to a contract required under
15 section 10-234bb of the general statutes;
16 (4) "Covered user" means any user of a covered platform in this state
17 who is not acting as the covered operator, or as an agent or affiliate of
18 the covered operator, of the covered platform;
19 (5) "Media item" means any text, image or video;
20 (6) "Operator" means any individual, corporation, limited liability
21 company, partnership, limited partnership, limited liability partnership,
22 association, joint stock company, unincorporated organization or other
23 legal entity that operates or provides a platform;
24 (7) "Platform" means any Internet web site, online service, online
25 application, mobile application or social media platform, or any portion
26 thereof; and
27 (8) "Sensitive content" means any content that the covered operator
28 of a covered platform deems to be in violation of the community
29 standards, or any similar guidelines or standards, such covered operator
30 has established for the covered platform.
31 (b) (1) No covered operator of a covered platform shall allow a
32 covered user to access any portion of the covered platform that
33 recommends, selects or prioritizes for display, either concurrently or
34 sequentially, media items generated or shared by users of such covered
35 platform if such recommendation, selection or prioritization is based, in
36 whole or in part, on any information associated with the covered user
37 or such covered user's device, unless:
38 (A) (i) The covered operator has used commercially reasonable and
39 technically feasible methods to determine that the covered user is not a
40 covered minor; or
41 (ii) If the covered user is a covered minor, the covered operator has
42 obtained verifiable consent from the covered minor's parent or legal
sHB5037 / File No. 179 2

sHB5037 File No. 179
43 guardian to recommend, select or prioritize media items for such
44 covered minor in the manner set forth in this subdivision;
45 (B) The recommendation, selection or prioritization (i) is based on
46 information that is not persistently associated with the covered user or
47 the covered user's device, and (ii) does not concern the covered user's
48 previous interactions with media items generated or shared by other
49 users of such covered platform;
50 (C) The recommendation, selection or prioritization is based on (i)
51 privacy or accessibility settings selected by the covered user, or (ii)
52 technical information concerning the covered user's device;
53 (D) The covered user has expressly and unambiguously requested
54 the display, blocking, prioritization or deprioritization of any specific
55 media item, media items from a specific author, creator or poster to
56 whom, or source to which, the covered user has subscribed or media
57 items shared by users to a specific page or group to which the covered
58 user has subscribed;
59 (E) The recommended, selected or prioritized media item is a direct
60 and private communication;
61 (F) The media item is recommended, selected or prioritized solely in
62 response to a specific search inquiry made by the covered user;
63 (G) The media item is recommended, selected or prioritized for
64 display solely because the media item (i) immediately follows any other
65 media item in a preexisting sequence, and (ii) is from the same author,
66 creator, poster or source; or
67 (H) The recommendation, selection or prioritization is necessary to
68 comply with any other provision of this section.
69 (2) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B) of this subdivision, a
70 covered operator that has used commercially reasonable and technically
71 feasible methods to determine a covered user's age and is unable to
72 determine whether the covered user is a covered minor shall presume
sHB5037 / File No. 179 3

sHB5037 File No. 179
73 that such covered user is not a covered minor for the purposes of this
74 subsection.
75 (B) A covered operator shall treat a covered user as a covered minor
76 if the covered operator obtains actual knowledge that the covered user
77 is a covered minor.
78 (3) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B) of this subdivision:
79 (i) No information that is collected for the purpose of determining a
80 covered user's age under this subsection shall be used for any other
81 purpose, and such information shall be deleted immediately after an
82 attempt is made to determine the covered user's age; and
83 (ii) No information that is collected for the purpose of obtaining
84 verifiable consent from a covered minor's parent or legal guardian shall
85 be used for any other purpose, and such information shall be deleted
86 immediately after an attempt is made to obtain such verifiable consent.
87 (B) Any information that is collected for any purpose set forth in
88 subparagraph (A) of this subdivision may be used or retained if such
89 use or retention is necessary to comply with any federal law or
90 regulation or any other law or regulation of this state.
91 (4) No covered operator shall withhold or degrade, or reduce the
92 quality or increase the price of, any product, service or feature due to
93 the prohibition against recommending, selecting or prioritizing media
94 items in the manner set forth in subdivision (1) of this subsection, unless
95 such withholding, degradation, reduction or increase is necessary for
96 such covered operator to comply with the provisions of this subsection.
97 (5) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to prohibit any
98 covered operator from taking any action to restrict access to, or the
99 availability of, any media item that such covered operator in good faith
100 considers to be obscene, lewd, lascivious, filthy, excessively violent,
101 harassing or otherwise objectionable, regardless of whether such media
102 item is protected under the Constitution of the state or the Constitution
103 of the United States.
sHB5037 / File No. 179 4

sHB5037 File No. 179
104 (c) (1) (A) Except as provided in subdivision (2) of this subsection, the
105 covered operator of a covered platform shall ensure that the covered
106 platform displays a clear and conspicuous warning, in black lettering
107 appearing against a white background and enclosed by a black border,
108 that reads:
109 "The Surgeon General has warned that while social media may have
110 benefits for some young users, social media is associated with
111 significant mental health harms and has not been proven safe for young
112 users."
113 (B) The covered operator of a covered platform shall ensure that, with
114 respect to each day on which a covered user uses the covered platform,
115 the warning required under subparagraph (A) of this subdivision is
116 displayed to the covered user (i) when such covered user first accesses
117 such covered platform on such day, in which case such warning shall (I)
118 occupy at least seventy-five per cent of the screen or window by which
119 such covered user accesses such covered platform on such day, and (II)
120 be displayed continuously for a period of at least thirty seconds without
121 allowing such covered user to dismiss such warning or shorten such
122 period, and (ii) immediately after such covered user has used such
123 covered platform for three continuous or noncontinuous hours during
124 such day, and immediately after each additional continuous or
125 noncontinuous hour of use during such day, in which case such warning
126 shall (I) occupy at least twenty-five per cent of the screen or window by
127 which such covered user has accessed such covered platform during
128 such day, and (II) be displayed continuously for a period of at least ten
129 seconds unless the covered user affirmatively dismisses such warning
130 by clicking on a conspicuous "X" icon.
131 (2) No covered operator shall be required to display the warning
132 required under subdivision (1) of this subsection to any covered user
133 whom the covered operator has reasonably determined is not a covered
134 minor.
135 (d) (1) No covered operator shall send any notification to a covered
136 minor concerning any recommendation, selection or prioritization
sHB5037 / File No. 179 5

sHB5037 File No. 179
137 made in the manner set forth in subdivision (1) of subsection (b) of this
138 section, unless:
139 (A) Such notification is sent to the covered minor during the hours
140 between eight o'clock a.m. and nine o'clock p.m. eastern time; or
141 (B) The covered operator has obtained verifiable consent from the
142 covered minor's parent or legal guardian to send notifications to such
143 covered minor outside of the time frame set forth in subparagraph (A)
144 of this subdivision.
145 (2) Each covered operator shall:
146 (A) As a default setting for such covered operator's covered platform
147 and unless otherwise required by a covered minor's verified parent or
148 legal guardian pursuant to subparagraph (B) of this subdivision, (i)
149 prevent the covered minor from accessing or receiving any notification
150 described in subdivision (1) of this subsection outside of the time frame
151 set forth in subparagraph (A) of subdivision (1) of this subsection, (ii)
152 limit the covered minor's access to any portion of such covered
153 operator's covered platform that recommends, selects or prioritizes
154 media items in the manner set forth in subdivision (1) of subsection (b)
155 of this section to a maximum period of one hour per day, (iii) set the
156 covered minor's covered platform account to a mode that does not allow
157 users, other than users to whom such covered minor is connected, to
158 view or respond to content posted by, or chat or exchange messages
159 with, such covered minor, and (iv) prevent the covered minor from
160 accessing, viewing or receiving sensitive content; and
161 (B) Establish and maintain a mechanism by which a covered minor's
162 verified parent or legal guardian may require such covered operator to
163 (i) prevent the covered minor from accessing or receiving any
164 notification described in subdivision (1) of this subsection outside of a
165 time frame specified by such parent or legal guardian, (ii) limit the
166 covered minor's access to any portion of such covered operator's
167 covered platform that recommends, selects or prioritizes media items in
168 the manner set forth in subdivision (1) of subsection (b) of this section
sHB5037 / File No. 179 6

sHB5037 File No. 179
169 to a maximum daily period specified by such parent or legal guardian,
170 or (iii) set the covered minor's covered platform account to a mode that
171 does not allow users, other than users to whom such covered minor is
172 connected, to view or respond to content posted by, or chat or exchange
173 messages with, such covered minor.
174 (e) Not later than March 1, 2028, and annually thereafter, each
175 covered operator shall publicly disclose, in a form and manner
176 prescribed by the Attorney General, the following information for the
177 preceding calendar year:
178 (1) The total number of covered users who used the covered
179 operator's covered platform during such year;
180 (2) The portion of the total number of covered users described in
181 subdivision (1) of this subsection for whom the covered operator
182 obtained verifiable consent from a parent or legal guardian under
183 subparagraph (A)(ii) of subdivision (1) of subsection (b) of this section;
184 (3) The portion of the total number of covered users described in
185 subdivision (1) of this subsection for whom the default settings set forth
186 in subparagraph (A) of subdivision (2) of subsection (d) of this section
187 were enabled, and the portion of such total number of covered users for
188 whom such default settings were not enabled; and
189 (4) The average amount of time per day that covered users used the
190 covered operator's covered platform, broken down by user age and
191 hour of day.
192 (f) Nothing in this section shall be construed to (1) require a covered
193 operator to provide a covered minor's parent or legal guardian with
194 access to, or control over, the covered minor's covered platform account
195 or any data associated therewith, unless provision of such access or
196 control is specifically required by this section, or (2) impose liability for
197 any commercial activity or action by a covered operator subject to 15
198 USC 6501, as amended from time to time, that is inconsistent with the
199 manner in which such commercial activity or action is treated under 15
sHB5037 / File No. 179 7

sHB5037 File No. 179
200 USC 6502, as amended from time to time.
201 (g) A violation of any provision of subsections (b) to (e), inclusive, of
202 this section shall be deemed an unfair or deceptive trade practice under
203 subsection (a) of section 42-110b of the general statutes.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 January 1, 2028 New section
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
In Subsec. (b)(1)(D), provisions were rewritten for clarity; and in Subsec.
(g), "any provision of" was added for clarity.
GL Joint Favorable Subst. -LCO
sHB5037 / File No. 179 8

sHB5037 File No. 179
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill makes various changes regarding social media and minors,
including creating a new unfair trade practice violation resulting in no
fiscal impact to the state. The Department of Consumer Protection
investigates unfair trade practice violations and has the resources and
expertise to meet the requirements of the bill.
The Out Years
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
sHB5037 / File No. 179 9

sHB5037 File No. 179
OLR Bill Analysis
sHB 5037
AN ACT PROMOTING THE SAFETY OF MINORS ON SOCIAL MEDIA
PLATFORMS.